New York, session 2025-2026, A11709.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 233-b of the real property law, as 2 added by section 12 of part O of chapter 36 of the laws of 2019, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 1. The provisions of this section shall apply to all manufactured 5 homes located in a manufactured home park as defined in section two 6 hundred thirty-three of this article; provided, however, that the 7 provisions of this section shall not apply to: 8 (a) manufactured homes located in manufactured home parks that are 9 subject to a regulatory agreement with a governmental entity to preserve 10 affordable housing or that otherwise limits rent increases [are exempt 11 from the provisions of this section]; or 12 (b) resident-owned manufactured home communities provided that: (i) 13 the community is owned and governed by resident-members of the communi- 14 ty; (ii) any monthly occupancy charges are established solely to recover 15 operating expenses, capital reserves, debt service, infrastructure 16 improvements, or other costs of operating the community; and (iii) the 17 community is subject to an affordability covenant, regulatory agreement, 18 or other affordability restriction imposed by a federal, state, or local 19 governmental housing program. For the purposes of this section, the 20 term "resident-owned manufactured home community" means a manufactured 21 home park in which title to the real property comprising such park is 22 owned by a cooperative corporation, not-for-profit corporation, limited 23 liability company, or other legal entity in which a majority of the 24 homeowners residing within the park are members, shareholders, or voting 25 participants with governance rights in the operation and management of 26 the park. 27 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16253-01-6